North Carolina statutes. Chapter 163. Elections and Election Laws.
Article 10. Primary Elections.
§ 163-112.
Death of candidate before primary; vacancy in single office.

Death of One of Two Candidates within 30 Days after the Filing Period Closes. — If at the time the filing period closes, only two persons have filed notice of candidacy for nomination by a political party to a single office, and one of the candidates
dies within 30 days after the filing period closes, then the proper board of elections shall, upon notice of the death, reopen the filing period for that party contest, for an additional three days. Should no candidate file during
the three days, the board of elections shall certify the remaining candidate as the nominee of his party as provided in

G.S. 163-110

.

Death of One of More Than Two Candidates within 30 Days after the Filing Period Closes. — If at the close of the filing period more than two candidates have filed for a single-seat office, and within 30 days after the filing period closes the board of
elections receives notice of a candidate’s death, the board shall immediately open the filing period for that party contest, for three additional days in order for candidates to file for that office. The name of the deceased candidate
shall not be printed on the ballot.In the event a candidate’s death occurs more than 30 days after the closing of the original filing period, the names of the remaining candidates shall be printed on the ballot. If the ballots
have been printed at the time death occurs, the ballots shall not be reprinted and any votes cast for a deceased candidate shall not be counted or considered for any purpose. In the event the death of a candidate or candidates
leaves only one candidate, then such candidate shall be certified as the party’s nominee for that office.

Vacancy in Group Offices within 30 Days after the Filing Period Closes. — If at the time the filing period closes more persons have filed notice of candidacy for nomination by a political party to an office constituting a group than there are positions
to be filled, and a candidate or candidates die within 30 days after the filing period closes, and there remains only the number of candidates equal to or fewer than the number of positions to be filled, the appropriate board of
elections shall reopen the filing period for that party contest, for three days for that office. Should no persons file during the three-day period, then those candidates already filed shall be certified as the party nominees for
that office.

Vacancy in Group Offices More Than 30 Days after the Filing Period Closes. — In the event a candidate or candidates death occurs more than 30 days after the original filing period closes for an office constituting a group, then regardless of the number
of candidates filed for nomination, the board of elections shall be governed as follows:

If the ballots have not been printed at the time the board of elections receives notice of the death, the deceased candidate’s name shall not be printed on the ballot.

If the ballots have been printed at the time the board of elections receives notice of the death, the ballots shall not be reprinted but votes cast for the deceased candidate shall not be counted for any purpose.

In the event the death of a candidate or candidates results in the number of candidates being equal to or less than the number of positions to be filled for that office, then the remaining candidates shall be certified as the party nominees for that office
and no primary shall be held for that office.

If death or disqualification of candidates results in the number of candidates being less than the number of positions to be filled for that office, then the appropriate party executive committee shall, in accordance with

G.S. 163-114

, make nominations of persons equal to the number of positions to be filled and no primary shall be held and those names shall be printed on the general election ballot.

History.
1959, c. 1054; 1967, c. 775, s. 1; 1981, c. 434; 1991, Ex. Sess., c. 1; 1993, c. 553, s. 60; 2001-466, s. 1(f); 2003-278, s. 4; 2003-434, Ex. Sess., s. 5(e); 2004-127, s. 13; 2017-6, s. 3; 2018-146, s. 3.1(a), (b).

Local Modification.

Anson County Board of Commissioners: 1991 (Reg. Sess., 1992), c. 781, s. 6 (but shall only be enforced as provided by Section 5 of the Voting Rights Act of 1965).

§ 163-113.
Nominee’s right to withdraw as candidate.

A person who has been declared the nominee of a political party for a specified office under the provisions of

G.S. 163-182.15

or

G.S. 163-110

, shall not be permitted to resign as a candidate unless, prior to the first day on which military and overseas absentee ballots are transmitted to voters under Article 21A of this Chapter, that [the] person submits to
the board of elections which certified the nomination a written request that person be permitted to withdraw.

History.
1929, c. 164, s. 8; 1967, c. 775, s. 1; 2001-398, s. 6; 2013-381, s. 23.1; 2017-6, s. 3; 2018-146, s. 3.1(a), (b).

§ 163-114.
Filling vacancies among party nominees occurring after nomination and before election.

If any person nominated as a candidate of a political party for one of the offices listed below (either in a primary or convention or by virtue of having no opposition in a primary) dies, resigns, or for any reason becomes ineligible or disqualified before
the date of the ensuing general election, the vacancy shall be filled by appointment according to the following instructions: Click to viewThe party executive making a nomination in accordance with the provisions of this section
shall certify the name of its nominee to the chairman of the board of elections, State or county, that has jurisdiction over the ballot item under

G.S. 163-182.4

. If at the time a nomination is made under this section the general election ballots have already been printed, the provisions of G.S. 163-165.3(c) shall apply. If a vacancy occurs in a nomination of a political
party and that vacancy arises from a cause other than death and the vacancy in nomination occurs more than 120 days before the general election, the vacancy in nomination may be filled under this section only if the appropriate
executive committee certifies the name of the nominee in accordance with this paragraph at least 75 days before the general election.

In a county which is partly in a multicounty judicial district, in choosing that county’s member or members of the judicial district executive committee for the multicounty district, only the county convention delegates or county executive committee members
who reside within the area of the county which is within that multicounty district may vote.

In a county not all of which is located in one congressional district, in choosing the congressional district executive committee member or members from that area of the county, only the county convention delegates or county executive committee members
who reside within the area of the county which is within the congressional district may vote.

In a county which is partly in a multi-county senatorial district or which is partly in a multi-county House of Representatives district, in choosing that county’s member or members of the senatorial district executive committee or House of Representatives
district executive committee for the multi-county district, only the county convention delegates or county executive committee members who reside within the area of the county which is within that multi-county district may vote.

An individual whose name appeared on the ballot in a primary election preliminary to the general election shall not be eligible to be nominated to fill a vacancy in the nomination of another party for the same office in the same year.

Position President Vacancy is to be filled by appointment of national executive committee of political party in which vacancy occurs Vice President Presidential elector or alternate elector Any elective State office United States Senator Vacancy is to
be filled by appointment of State executive committee of politicalparty in which vacancy occurs A district office, including: Member of the United States House of Representatives Judge of district court District Attorney Appropriate
district executive committee of political party in which vacancy occurs State Senator in a multicounty senatorial district Member of State House of Representatives in a multicounty representative district State Senator in a single
county senatorial district Member of State House of Representatives in a single-county representative district Any elective county office County executive committee of political party in which vacancy occurs, provided, in the case
of the State Senator or State Representative in a single-county district where not all the county is located in that district, then in voting, only those members of the county executive committee who reside within the district shall
vote Judge of superior court in a single-county judicial district where the district is the whole county or part of the county County executive committee of political party in which vacancy occurs; provided, in the case of a superior
court judge in a single- county district where not all the county is located in that district, then in voting, only those members of the county executive committee who reside within the district shall vote Judge of superior court in
a multicounty judicial district Appropriate district executive committee of political party in which vacancy occurs.

History.
1929, c. 164, s. 19; 1967, c. 775, s. 1; 1973, c. 793, s. 45; 1981 (Reg. Sess., 1982), c. 1265, ss. 4, 5; 1987, c. 509, s. 10; c. 526; c. 738, s. 124; 1987 (Reg. Sess., 1988), c. 1037, s. 126.1; 1991, c. 727, s. 8; 1996,
2nd Ex. Sess., c. 9, s. 13; 2001-353, s. 1; 2001-403, s. 8; 2001-460, s. 4; 2003-142, s. 1; 2006-234, s. 6; 2017-3, s. 9; 2017-6, s. 3; 2018-146, s. 3.1(a), (b).

§ 163-115.
Special provisions for obtaining nominations when vacancies occur in certain offices.

If a vacancy occurs in the office of the clerk of superior court, otherwise than by expiration of the term, or if the people fail to elect, the vacancy shall be filled as provided in Sec. 9(3) of Article IV of the North Carolina Constitution. If the vacancy
occurs after the time for filing notice of candidacy in the primary has expired in a year when a regular election is not being held to elect a clerk of the superior court by expiration of term, then the county executive committee
of each political party shall nominate a candidate whose name shall appear on the general election ballot. The candidate elected in the general election shall serve the unexpired portion of the term of the person causing the vacancy.

In the event a special election is called to fill a vacancy in the State’s delegation in the United States House of Representatives, the provisions of

G.S. 163-13

shall apply.

If a vacancy occurs in an elective State or district office (other than member of the United States House of Representatives) during the period opening 10 days before the filing period for the office ends and closing 30 days before the ensuing general
election, a nomination shall be made by the proper executive committee of each political party as provided in

G.S. 163-114

, and the names of the nominees shall be printed on the general election ballots.

If a vacancy occurs on a county board of commissioners and

G.S. 153A-27

or

G.S. 153A-27.1

requires that a person shall be elected to the seat vacated for the remainder of the unexpired term, and the vacancy occurs:

Beginning on the tenth day before the filing period ends under

G.S. 163-106.2

, a nomination shall be made by the county executive committee of each political party and the names of the nominees shall be printed on the general election ballots.

Prior to the tenth day before the filing period ends under

G.S. 163-106.2

, nominations shall be made by primary election as provided by this Article.

If a vacancy occurs in the office of United States Senator, and the vacancy occurs:

Beginning on the tenth day before the filing period ends under

G.S. 163-106.2

, a nomination shall be made by the State executive committee of each political party and the names of the nominees shall be printed on the general election ballots.

Prior to the tenth day before the filing period ends under

G.S. 163-106.2

, nominations shall be made by primary election as provided by this Article.

History.
1915, c. 101, s. 33; 1917, c. 179, s. 3; c. 218; C.S., s. 6053; 1923, c. 111, s. 16; 1955, c. 574; 1957, c. 1242; 1966, Ex. Sess., c. 5, s. 14; 1967, c. 775, s. 1; 1973, c. 793, s. 46; 1985, c. 563, ss. 7, 7.1; c. 759, s.
1; 1997-456, s. 27; 2017-6, s. 3; 2018-146, s. 3.1(a), (b).

§§ 163-116 through 163-118.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 1973, c. 793, ss. 47-49.

§ 163-119.
Voting by unaffiliated voter in party primary.

If a political party has, by action of its State Executive Committee reported to the State Board of Elections by resolution delivered no later than the first day of December preceding a primary, provided that unaffiliated voters may vote in the primary
of that party, an unaffiliated voter may vote in the primary of that party by announcing that intention under

G.S. 163-166.7(a)

. For a party to withdraw its permission, it must do so by action of its State Executive Committee, similarly reported to the State Board of Elections no later than the first day of December preceding the primary where
the withdrawal is to become effective.

History.
1993 (Reg. Sess., 1994), c. 762, s. 7; 2002-159, s. 21(a); 2017-6, s. 3; 2018-146, s. 3.1(a), (b).

§§ 163-120,
163-121.

Reserved for future codification purposes.